Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-307 Free insurance. Except as
otherwise provided by law, no insurer, either domestic, foreign or alien, shall
issue or cause to be issued any policy of insurance of any type or description
upon life or property, real or personal, whenever the policy of insurance is to
be furnished or delivered to the purchaser or bailee of any property, real or
personal, either as an inducement to purchase or bailment of the property, real
or personal, or as a part of the consideration for the purchase or bailment of
the property, real or personal. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next